Hawaii statutes.
§53-2 Redevelopment agency; creation.
(a) The council of a county by resolution may create a local redevelopment
agency for the county, which shall be a county agency and a public body,
corporate and politic, and shall consist of five members, appointed by the
mayor, with the approval of the council, who shall be outstanding and
public-spirited citizens and who shall have resided in the county for at least
three years immediately preceding their appointment. The members of the agency
shall serve for terms of five years each; provided that upon the initial
appointment of the members of the agency, one member shall be appointed for a
term of one year, the second member for a term of two years, the third member
for a term of three years, the fourth member for a term of four years and a
fifth member for a term of five years. Each vacancy shall be filled by the
appointing power for the remainder of the unexpired term. No more than three
of the members shall belong to the same political party.

(b) The appointing power which appoints a
member may appoint an acting member to serve during the absence or inability to
serve of such member, and the acting member shall, while so acting, have all of
the powers of the member in whose place the acting member is temporarily
appointed. Members shall hold over until their respective successors are
appointed and qualify. Members shall receive no remuneration for their
services except actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
No member shall hold any elective or other appointive office or position of the
member's county. Each member shall be required to give bond in the sum of
$15,000 for the faithful performance of the member's duties, and the agency may
also require any of its subordinates to give bond, the premiums upon the bonds
to be paid by the agency. [L 1949, c 379, pt of §4; am L 1951, c 244, §2; RL
1955, §143-3; am L 1957, c 64, §1; am imp L 1967, c 80, §1; HRS §53-2; gen ch
1985]

Attorney General Opinions

Redevelopment agencies are not "political
subdivisions" within meaning of §103-53 and are not subject to tax
clearance requirements. Att. Gen. Op. 62-14.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next